src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
Proper noun inflection
The Võro language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_1HANS1A  1 hanśa:hanśa

LEXICON PROP_1VIU  1 viu:viu

LEXICON PROP_1HERRAE  1 herrä:herrä

* Yaml: **suhvli**

* Yaml: **kerge**

LEXICON PROP_3ALADU  aladu:aladu
* Yaml: **peraedue**

LEXICON PROP_VERE  Rakvere:Rakv
* Yaml: **Rakvere**

* Yaml: **tervues**

* Yaml: **A-ainus**

* Yaml: **N-oppaja5**

* Yaml: **N-oppaja5**

* Yaml: **fueuesiga**

harmony: front

kipõń:kipõń
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

sallai:sallai
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

elläi:elläi
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

tukõv:tukõv
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

LEXICON PROP_10AMEERIGA  Ameeriga:Ameerik
cf. _10HWRAK

LEXICON PROP_10ESAEK  esäk:esäk

LEXICON PROP_10LEMBIT  Lembit:Lembi%{td%}

LEXICON PROP_10VIDRIK  vidrik:vidrik
gradation: no

Gradation: No

Gradation: No

Gradation: No

LEXICON PROP_14HAMMAS  hammas:hamba, saabas:saapa
gradation: yes
distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation

distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h

distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h

kotus:kotus
* Yaml: **N-kotus15**

kotus:kotus
* Yaml: **N-kotus15**

kotus:kotus
* Yaml: **N-kotus15**

Gradation: No

LEXICON PROP_16ABILINW 
abilinõ:abili
* Yaml: **N-abilinw16**

Gradation: No

Gradation: No

Gradation: No

gradation: yes
vowel_harmony: front

gradation: yes
vowel_harmony: front

gradation: yes

* LEXICON PROP_29KUU  kuu:kuu
Gradation: No

* LEXICON PROP_29HAEAE  kuu:kuu
Gradation: No

Gradation: No

gradation: yes

gradation: yes

tarõ:tar

nimi:nim

pesä:pesä

pesä:pesä

LEXICON PROP_36TUUM1  tuuḿ:t%{ou%}%{ou%}m
:%{back%} NMN_36TUUM1/XX1-SG_OBL ;  This allows for place names, which, for the most part, have nominative singulars that are identical to their genitive singulars.

LEXICON PROP_36SAERG1  särǵ:särgʼ

LEXICON PROP_36PAEIV  päiv:päiv

kogõr:kogõr
* Yaml: **N-kogwr36**
derived from 36särǵ

LEXICON PROP_37PINI  pini:pini

LEXICON PROP_37WLI  pini:pini

* LEXICON PROP_38PULL1  pulĺ:pull

* LEXICON PROP_38VIKS1  pulĺ:pull

* LEXICON PROP_38PAPP1  papṕ:papp

LEXICON PROP_40TALO  talo:talo

LEXICON PROP_40UJA  uja:uja

LEXICON PROP_41ASK  ask:asko
* Yaml: __aig, aig__

LEXICON PROP_44SWDA  sõda:sõda

LEXICON PROP_46HAIN  hain:hain
* Yaml: **N-jalg, N-hain**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>

---
